Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-916
Act; intent.

The Administrative Procedure Act is intended to constitute an independent act establishing minimum administrative procedure for all agencies.

Laws 1959, c. 456, § 10, p. 1514;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 18.

The purpose of this act is to establish a minimum administrative procedure. County of Lancaster v. State Board of Equalization & Assessment, 180 Neb. 497, 143 N.W.2d 885 (1966); County of Brown v. State Board of Equalization & Assessment, 180 Neb. 487, 143 N.W.2d 896 (1966); County of Blaine v. State Board of Equalization & Assessment, 180 Neb. 471, 143 N.W.2d 880 (1966).